Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-124.02
Holder of license under prior law; how treated.

On May 1, 2005, the holder of a Class D-1 license, Class E license, or Class K license shall be issued a Class D license, the holder of a Class F license shall be issued a Class A license, and the holder of a Class H license, Class J license, or bottle club license shall be issued a Class I license. Any conditions placed on a Class D-1, Class E, Class F, Class H, Class J, Class K, or bottle club license by the local governing body or the commission prior to May 1, 2005, shall continue to apply to the license issued to such holder on such date.

Laws 2004, LB 485, § 16.